Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1701
Public records; disposition and destruction.

All cities and villages are empowered to provide for the disposition or destruction of public records when the records have been determined to be of no further legal, administrative, fiscal, or historical value by the State Records Administrator pursuant to sections 84-1201 to 84-1220; Provided, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the minutes of the clerk and the permanent ordinance and resolution books, or any other record classified as permanent by the State Records Administrator.

Laws 1955, c. 53, § 1, p. 175;

Laws 1969, c. 105, § 1, p. 480.